Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-716. Regional needs assessment.

Each regional solid waste management board created pursuant to this subchapter shall prepare a regional needs assessment evaluating the solid waste management needs within its regional solid waste management district. Provided, however, that such regional needs assessments need not include an evaluation of the need for landfills where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character.

Such regional needs assessment shall be submitted for Division of Environmental Quality review, and the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall approve or disapprove it within ninety (90) days after submission.

The regional needs assessments for boards created pursuant to § 8-6-703 shall be due every four (4) years.

The division may, at its discretion, stagger the due dates by random selection so that approximately one-fourth (¼) of the districts will submit a regional needs assessment each year.

The division will notify in writing the districts of the date on which their regional needs assessments are due.

The board may obtain an extension of that deadline from the director.

A board created pursuant to § 8-6-703 in a region having a projected solid waste disposal capacity of less than five (5) years or in a region having no landfill for solid waste disposal shall prepare and submit a regional needs assessment annually, with the first regional needs assessment due on June 30, 1995, and with updated regional needs assessments due on June 30 of each year thereafter.

Any board which submitted the biennial regional needs assessment due on January 31, 1995, under prior law, shall prepare and submit its next regional needs assessment on June 30, 1996, with updated regional needs assessments due on June 30 of each year thereafter.

The regional needs assessment shall include, at the minimum, the following:

An evaluation of the amount of solid waste generated within the district and the amount of remaining disposal capacity, expressed in years, at the solid waste disposal facilities within the district that are permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.;

An evaluation of the solid waste collection, transportation, and disposal needs of all localities within the district; and

An evaluation and balancing of the environmental, economic, and other relevant factors which would be implicated by acceptance of solid waste from beyond the boundaries of the district.

Each board shall update its regional needs assessment, at the minimum, every four (4) years.

At a time not later than five (5) years before the disposal capacity in a region reaches its projected capacity, the board shall develop a request for proposals to increase the district's projected capacity for solid waste disposal within the district in accordance with its regional needs assessment.

No landfill shall receive solid waste from beyond the district boundaries when projected solid waste disposal capacity within the district is less than five (5) years, except as may be otherwise specified pursuant to this subchapter.

No owner or operator of a landfill serving a limited area of a district shall be required to increase the landfill's service area to accommodate the needs of the district.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1993, No. 619, § 3; 1995, No. 1030, § 1; 1999, No. 428, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2653-2655.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1030, § 1, subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) ended:

“No needs assessments shall be due until March 31, 1996.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in (a)(1)(A)(ii); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (a)(1)(C)(i).

8-6-717. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning solid waste management plans, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1153, § 2. The former section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-718. Waste tire collection center.

Beginning July 1, 1993, each regional solid waste management board shall establish a waste tire collection center at which residents of the regional solid waste management district may dispose of their waste motor vehicle tires at no cost except as provided by rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or the board.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 556.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

8-6-719. Regional composting program.

Each regional solid waste management board shall establish a program for the composting of yard waste.

Each board shall establish a pilot program for the composting of yard waste collected in an area with a population of at least five thousand (5,000) persons. The pilot program shall be established in each regional solid waste management district by July 1, 1992.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-720. Opportunity to recycle — Recyclable materials collection centers — Definition.

Each regional solid waste management board shall ensure that its residents have an opportunity to recycle.

At least one (1) recyclable materials collection center shall be available in each county of a regional solid waste management district unless the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission grants the district an exemption. An exemption may be granted if a county is adequately served by a recyclable materials collection center in another county.

Boards shall assess the operation of existing and proposed recycling centers and materials recovery facilities to determine the adequacy of the existing and proposed recycling centers and materials recovery facilities for the collection and recovery of recyclable materials. Boards shall give due consideration to existing recycling facilities in ensuring the opportunity to recycle and are encouraged to use, to the extent practicable, persons engaged in the business of recycling on March 26, 1991, whether or not the persons were operating for profit.

As used in this subsection, “opportunity to recycle” means availability of curbside pickup or collection centers for recyclable materials at sites that are convenient for persons to use.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall determine by rule the adequacy of the facilities and the number and type of recyclable materials for which the services in this section must be provided.

Each board shall provide information on how, when, and where materials may be recycled, including a promotional program that encourages source separation of residential, commercial, industrial, and institutional materials.

Each board should ensure, alone or in conjunction with other boards, that materials separated for recycling are taken to markets for sale or to materials recovery facilities.

A board shall not prevent a person generating or collecting recyclable materials from delivering the recyclable materials to a recycling facility of the generator's or collector's choice.

However, no person shall divert to personal use or commercial purpose any recyclable materials placed in a container as a part of a regional recycling program without the consent of the generator or the collector.

Any person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of unlawfully diverting recyclable materials under a regional recycling program shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Each board shall incorporate into its solid waste management plan its proposal for fulfilling the obligations of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the planning or implementation of any regional recycling program prior to compliance with the requirements of subsection (f) of this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2001, No. 1720, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 557; 2019, No. 693, § 16; 2019, No. 910, § 2656.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (a)(1), deleted “Beginning July 1, 1992” from the beginning and deleted the second sentence; deleted “Beginning July 1, 1993” from the beginning of (a)(2); substituted “the existing and proposed recycling centers and materials recovery” for “these” in (a)(3); and added (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

Cross References.

Theft of recyclable materials, § 5-36-121.

8-6-721. Licensing haulers of solid waste.

A person who engages in the business of hauling solid waste must obtain a license from the regional solid waste management board if:

The person is engaged in the collection of solid waste within the regional solid waste management district; or

The person is engaged in the transportation of solid waste for disposal or storage in the regional solid waste management district.

A license shall be issued only to a person, partnership, corporation, association, the State of Arkansas, a political subdivision of the state, an improvement district, a sanitation authority, or another regional solid waste management district.

The regional solid waste management district may engage in the hauling of solid waste within its own regional solid waste management district without licensure but shall comply with all applicable standards required under this section.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall establish classifications of haulers, which shall be used by regional solid waste management districts in licensing haulers. The classifications shall be based on the nature and size of the loads transported.

The commission shall promulgate minimum standards for a license to haul solid waste.

One (1) of the criteria for obtaining such a license shall be the financial responsibility of the hauler.

The board may impose more stringent standards than the minimum standards established by the commission.

The board may set a reasonable licensing fee for each class of haulers.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2.

8-6-722. Penalties.

Any person who violates this subchapter or any rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or of a regional solid waste management board shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both imprisonment and fine.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 558.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

8-6-723. Alternative formation of original districts.

In lieu of forming a regional solid waste management district under any other provision of this subchapter, a district may be created by interlocal agreement of the local governments in any county with a population of at least ninety thousand (90,000) persons and in which there is a permitted landfill on January 1, 1991. The regional solid waste management board of the district shall be established by interlocal agreement.

The creation of the district shall be effective upon the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality's receipt of written notice in the form of a joint resolution by the local governments.

[Repealed.]

The creation of a district shall be effective upon the governing body of the authority notifying the director in writing. The governing body of a district created under this subsection shall be determined by the authority creating the district. The provisions of § 8-6-703 or any other section of this subchapter which provides for the method of selection of the governing body of a district shall not apply to districts formed under this subsection.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have no authority to add to or otherwise change the boundaries of a district created under this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2657, 2658.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2); and repealed (b)(1).

8-6-724. Regional standards.

Regional solid waste management boards may adopt more restrictive standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities than the state government or United States Government, provided such standards are based upon generally accepted scientific knowledge or engineering practices and are consistent with the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 902, § 1.

Subchapter 8
— Bonds by Regional Solid Waste Management Districts

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 5, provided: “Any solid waste management system operating under the authority of § 14-233-101 et seq. with five (5) or more counties currently being served by these authorities upon the passage of this act shall, upon notification to the regional board and the Commission, shall be designated a regional solid waste management district. The governing body of the district shall be as determined by the authority by resolution.”

Cross References.

Procedures and regulations, § 8-6-708.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 9: Mar. 26, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some areas of the state are facing critical shortages of solid waste disposal capacity due to the difficulties in sitting landfill facilities and the difficulties of financing public waste recovery and disposal facilities at the local level. It is found that regional solid waste authorities are needed to expedite the financing, sitting, and operation of new waste management facilities in order that the health and welfare of the citizens of Arkansas be insured and that the state's environment be protected. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 439, § 5: Feb. 24, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the mandatory requirement that the Arkansas Development Finance Authority advise Solid Waste Management Districts and make a determination that the financing and project are financially feasible and advisable in connection with the issuance of Solid Waste Management Bonds is unnecessary and constitutes an undue burden upon the issuance of such bonds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

8-6-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means the Arkansas Development Finance Authority;

“Board” means a regional solid waste management board created under § 8-6-701 et seq.;

“Bonds” means bonds and any series of bonds authorized by and issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter and comprehends “revenue bonds”, as defined in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 65, § 3;

“Costs” or “project costs” means, but shall not be limited to:

All costs of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, or extension of any project, including the cost of studies, plans, specifications, surveys, and estimates of costs and revenues relating thereto;

All costs of land, land rights, rights-of-way and easements, water rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, certificates, franchises, and the preparation of applications for and securing them;

Administrative, organizational, legal, engineering, and inspection expenses;

Financing fees, expenses, and costs, including, but not limited to, costs of credit enhancement or guaranties, trustees' fees, paying agents' fees or similar fees, and fees to financial advisors and other entities assisting in the issuance of bonds;

Working capital;

All machinery and equipment, including construction equipment;

Interest on the bonds during the period of construction and for such reasonable period thereafter as may be determined by the issuing or borrowing district;

Establishment of reserves; and

All other expenditures of the issuing or borrowing regional solid waste management district incidental, necessary, or convenient to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, or extension of any project and the placing of it in operation;

“District” means a regional solid waste management district created under § 8-6-701 et seq.;

“Project” means any real property, personal property, or mixed property of any and every kind that can be used or will be useful in controlling, collecting, storing, removing, handling, reducing, disposing of, treating, and otherwise dealing in and concerning solid waste, including, without limitation, property that can be used or that will be useful in extracting, converting to steam, including the acquisition, handling, storage, and utilization of coal, lignite, or other fuel of any kind, or water that can be used or that will be useful in converting solid waste to steam, and distributing the steam to users thereof, or otherwise separating and preparing solid waste for reuse, or that can be used or will be useful in generating electric energy by the use of solid waste as a source of generating power and distributing the electric energy to purchasers or users thereof in accordance with the general laws of the state.

However, for the purposes of this subchapter, not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the fuel used to produce steam or electricity from any project shall consist of materials other than solid waste; and

“Solid waste” means the same as provided in § 8-6-702.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-802. Construction.

The powers provided by this subchapter shall be supplemental to all other powers conferred on regional solid waste management boards.

Except as expressly provided in this subchapter, the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, equipment, or operation and maintenance of projects under the provisions of this subchapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, equipment, and operation and maintenance of public works or facilities, including, without limitation, laws pertaining to public bidding, paying prevailing wages, transfer or exchange of title to real or personal property, or any other aspect of the acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, equipping, or operation or maintenance of public works or public projects, or transfer or exchange of title to real or personal property, none of which laws shall be applicable to projects under this subchapter.

This subchapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-803. Pledge of rents, fees, and charges.

A regional solid waste management board may pledge any rents, fees, and charges imposed by the board to secure the repayment of bonds issued to finance projects, as provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-804. Bonds — Issuance, execution, and sale.

Regional solid waste management boards are authorized to use any available funds and revenues for the accomplishment of projects and may issue bonds, as authorized by this subchapter, for the purpose of paying project costs and accomplishing projects, either alone or together with other available funds and revenues.

The issuance of bonds shall be by resolution of the board.

The bonds may be coupon bonds payable to bearer, subject to registration as to principal or as to principal and interest, or fully registered bonds without coupons, may contain exchange privileges, may be issued in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates, may be in such form, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices, and may contain such terms, covenants, and conditions as the resolution may provide, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds, the collection and disposition of revenues, the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the investing and reinvesting of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes, the nature and extent of the security, the rights, duties, and obligations of the regional solid waste management district and the trustee for the holders or registered owners of the bonds, and the rights of the holders or registered owners of the bonds.

There may be successive bond issues for the purpose of financing the same project, and there may be successive bond issues for financing the cost of reconstructing, replacing, constructing additions to, extending, improving, and equipping projects already in existence, whether or not originally financed by bonds issued under this subchapter, with each successive issue to be authorized as provided by this subchapter. Priority between and among issues and successive issues as to security of the pledge of revenues and lien on the project involved may be controlled by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

Subject to the provisions of this subchapter pertaining to registration, the bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale for such price, including, without limitation, sale at a discount, and in such manner as the board may determine by resolution.

Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the chair and secretary of the board, but one (1) of such signatures must be manual. The coupons attached to the bonds may be executed by the facsimile signature of the chair of the board. In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, their signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes. The seal of the board shall be placed or printed on each bond in such manner as the board shall determine.

Prior to the issuance of any bonds pursuant to this subchapter, the district may seek the advice of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority as to the financial feasibility of the project to be financed, and, if so, shall provide the authority with such information and documentation as it may reasonably request in order to render that advice.

In the event the district seeks the advice of the authority, the authority shall be entitled to reasonable compensation for its services as determined by the district and the authority.

The district may request the authority to designate it as a developer, as contemplated by § 15-5-403, and hence, to guarantee the bonds on such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon by the district and the authority, consistent with the program delineated in the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Bond Guaranty Act of 1985, § 15-5-401 et seq.

The district may also request that the authority be the issuer of the bonds and loan the proceeds thereof to the district, secured by a pledge of revenues from the project on such terms as may be necessary to permit the sale of the bonds, consistent with the provisions hereof applicable to the issuance of bonds directly by districts.

Boards are specifically authorized to apply for and receive loans from the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission to finance projects from the proceeds of the commission's bonds issued pursuant to the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., on terms mutually acceptable to the borrowing board and the commission, including, but not limited to, provisions for a pledge of revenues to secure such loans, as set forth in § 8-6-803. The commission is authorized but not required to require, as a prerequisite to approving any such loan, that the borrowing board comply with some or all of the requirements of subsections (a) and (f) of this section and subdivisions (b)(1) and (g)(1) of this section. The commission is further authorized to enter into agreements with the authority for such services to the commission or to the borrowing boards as the commission deems necessary or desirable in furtherance of the commission's powers and duties under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., the authority granted hereby being in addition to those powers and not in derogation or restriction thereof.

Before the issuance of a bond under this subchapter, the district shall obtain approval by the quorum court to issue the bond.

If the regional solid waste management district is comprised of multiple counties, approval shall be obtained from the quorum court of each county.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4; 1995, No. 439, § 1; 2019, No. 891, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (i).

8-6-805. Bonds — Trust indenture.

The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide for the execution by the regional solid waste management district with a bank or trust company within or without this state of a trust indenture which defines the rights of the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The indenture may control the priority between and among successive issues and may contain any other terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the custody and application of proceeds of the bonds, the maintaining of rates and charges, the collection and disposition of revenues, the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the nature and extent of the security and pledging of revenues, the rights, duties, and obligations of the district and the trustee for the holders or registered owners of the bonds, and the rights of the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing any bonds issued under this subchapter may or may not impose a foreclosable mortgage lien upon or security interest in the project financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds, and the nature and extent of the mortgage lien or security interest may be controlled by the resolution or trust indenture, including, without limitation, provisions pertaining to the release of all or part of the project properties from the mortgage lien or security interest and the priority of the mortgage lien or security interest in the event of the issuance of additional bonds.

Subject to the terms, conditions, and restrictions which may be contained in the resolution or trust indenture, any holder or registered owner of bonds issued under this subchapter or of any coupon attached thereto may, either at law or in equity, enforce the mortgage lien or security interest and may, by proper suit, compel the performance of the duties of the members and employees of the regional solid waste management board as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-806. Bonds — Default.

In the event of a default in the payment of the principal of, premium on, if any, or interest on any bonds issued under this subchapter, any court having jurisdiction may appoint a receiver to take charge of all or any part of the project in which there is a mortgage lien or security interest securing the bonds in default.

The receiver shall have the power and authority to operate and maintain the project, to charge and collect rates, payments, rents, and charges sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of, premium on, if any, and interest on the bonds, after providing for the payment of any costs of receivership and operating expenses of the project, and to apply the revenues derived from the project in conformity with this subchapter and the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds.

When the default has been cured, the receivership shall be ended and the project returned to the regional solid waste management district.

The relief afforded by this section shall be construed to be in addition and supplemental to the remedies that may be afforded the trustee for the bondholders and the bondholders in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds and shall be so granted and administered as to accord full recognition to priority rights of bondholders as to the pledge of revenues from and the mortgage lien on and security interest in the project as specified in and fixed by the resolutions or trust indentures authorizing or securing successive bond issues.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-807. Bonds — Liability — Payment and security.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter and that the bonds are obligations only of the regional solid waste management district.

No member of the regional solid waste management board shall be personally liable on the bonds or for any damages sustained by anyone in connection with any contracts entered into in carrying out the purpose and intent of this subchapter unless he or she shall have acted with corrupt intent.

The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be payable from and may be secured by a pledge of revenues derived from the project acquired, constructed, reconstructed, equipped, extended, or improved, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of the bonds or obligations of the owners of projects.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-808. Refunding bonds — Issuance.

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under this subchapter. Refunding bonds may be combined with bonds issued under the provisions of § 14-233-109 into a single issue.

When refunding bonds are issued, they may either be sold or delivered in exchange for the bonds being refunded. If sold, the proceeds may either be applied to the payment of the bonds being refunded or deposited into escrow for the retirement thereof.

All refunding bonds shall in all respects be issued and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of those bonds.

The resolution under which refunding bonds are issued may provide that any of the refunding bonds shall have the same priority of lien on and security interest in project revenues and the project as was enjoyed by the bonds refunded by them.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-809. Pledge of rates, fees, and charges.

If the regional solid waste management board pledges rates, fees, and charges, then for as long as any bonds are outstanding and unpaid, the rates, fees, and charges shall be so fixed by the regional solid waste management district as to provide revenues sufficient:

To pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects, and all necessary repairs, replacements, or renewals thereof;

To pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds, including bonds subsequently issued for additional projects, payable from the revenues;

To create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing bonds; and

To pay any and all amounts which the district may be obligated to pay from project revenues by law or contract.

Any pledge made by a district pursuant to this subchapter shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made.

The revenues so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the district or any fiduciary on its behalf shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act.

The lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the district without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof.

The resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-810. Rights of bondholders.

Any holder or registered owner of bonds or coupons pertaining to the bonds, except to the extent the rights given in this subchapter may be restricted by the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds and coupons, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted under this subchapter or, to the extent permitted by law, under the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds or under any agreement or other contract executed by a regional solid waste management district pursuant to this subchapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this subchapter or by the resolution or trust indenture to be performed by any district, or by any officer of the foregoing, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, fees, and charges.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-811. Bonds — Tax exemption.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter and the interest thereon shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes, including property, income, inheritance, and estate taxes. Provided, however, that nothing in this subchapter shall preclude a regional solid waste management district from requesting the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to issue taxable bonds in furtherance of the purposes of this subchapter, on such terms as the district and the authority deem advisable and in conformity with the authority's statutory authority for issuance of such taxable bonds.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-812. Tax-exempt status of property and income of district.

All properties at any time owned by the regional solid waste management district and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-813. Investment of public funds in bonds.

Any municipality or any board, commission, or other authority established by ordinance of any municipality or the boards of trustees, respectively, of the firemen's relief and pension fund and the policemen's pension and relief fund of any municipality or the board of trustees of any retirement system created by the General Assembly may, in its discretion, invest any of its funds not immediately needed for its purposes in bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.

8-6-814. Transfer of facilities to district by county or municipality.

Any municipality or county may acquire facilities for a project, or any portion thereof, including a project site, by gift, purchase, lease, or condemnation, and may transfer the facilities to the regional solid waste management district by sale, lease, or gift. The transfer may be authorized by ordinance of the governing body without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations, or other provisions contained in any other law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 4.